services/web/node_modules/@overleaf/dictionaries/dictionaries/fo.aff
# ó-
#
# Dømi:
#   ókendur, óvinur
SFX R Y 37
SFX R   a     i           a                        # 
SFX R   jóða  ýður        jóða                     # 
SFX R   óða   ýður        [^j]óða                  # 
SFX R   jósa  ýsur        jósa                     # 
SFX R   ósa   ýsur        [^j]ósa                  # 
SFX R   jóta  ýtur        jóta                     # 
SFX R   óta   ýtur        [^j]óta                  # 
SFX R   úgva  ýgur        úgva                     # 
SFX R   úka   ýkur        úka                      # 
SFX R   úpa   ýpur        úpa                      # 
SFX R   jóða  eyð         jóða                     # 
SFX R   óða   eyð         [^j]óða                  # 
SFX R   jósa  eys         jósa                     # 
SFX R   ósa   eys         [^j]ósa                  # 
SFX R   jóta  eyt         jóta                     # 
SFX R   óta   eyt         [^j]óta                  # 
SFX R   úgva  eyg         úgva                     # 
SFX R   úka   eyk         úka                      # 
SFX R   úpa   eyp         úpa                      # 
SFX R   jóða  uðu         jóða                     # 
SFX R   óða   uðu         [^j]óða                  # 
SFX R   jósa  usu         jósa                     # 
SFX R   ósa   usu         [^j]ósa                  # 
SFX R   jóta  utu         jóta                     # 
SFX R   óta   utu         [^j]óta                  # 
SFX R   úgva  ugu         úgva                     # 
SFX R   úka   uku         úka                      # 
SFX R   úpa   upu         úpa                      # 
SFX R   jóða  oðið        jóða                     # 
SFX R   óða   oðið        [^j]óða                  # 
SFX R   jósa  osið        jósa                     # 
SFX R   ósa   osið        [^j]ósa                  # 
SFX R   jóta  otið        jóta                     # 
SFX R   óta   otið        [^j]óta                  # 
SFX R   úgva  ogið        úgva                     # 
SFX R   úka   okið        úka                      # 
SFX R   úpa   opið        úpa                      # 

# út-
#
# Dømi:
#   útbyggja
PFX z Y 1
PFX z   0     ó           .                        # 

# av-
#
# Dømi:
#   avgera
PFX y Y 1
PFX y   0     út          .                        # 

# inn-
#
# Dømi:
#   inngjald
PFX x Y 1
PFX x   0     av          .                        # 

# upp-
#
# Dømi:
#   uppgeva
PFX w Y 1
PFX w   0     inn         .                        # 

PFX v Y 1
PFX v   0     upp         .                        # 
